Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB443.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 510.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the third degree when:
(a) Being twenty-one (21) years of age or older[old or more], he or she engages
in sexual intercourse with another person who is under[less than] sixteen (16)
years old;
(b) Being at least ten (10) years older than a person who is sixteen (16) or
seventeen (17) years old at the time of sexual intercourse, he or she engages in
sexual intercourse with the person;
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years of age or older[old or more], he or she engages
in sexual intercourse with another person who is under[less than] eighteen
(18) years old and for whom he or she provides a foster family home as
defined in KRS 600.020;
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she engages in sexual intercourse with a minor who is
under eighteen (18) years old with whom he or she comes into contact as a
result of that position;
(e) Being a jailer, or an employee, contractor, vendor, or volunteer of the
Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, or a detention
facility as defined in KRS 520.010, or of an entity under contract with either
department or a detention facility for the custody, supervision, evaluation, or
treatment of offenders, he or she subjects a person who he or she knows is
incarcerated, supervised, evaluated, or treated by the Department of
Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, detention facility, or contracting
entity, to sexual intercourse;[ or]
(f) Being a peace officer, while serving in his or her official capacity, he or she
Page 1 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
subjects a person who the officer:
1. Arrested, held in custody, or investigated for commission of a traffic or
criminal offense; or
2. Knew or should have known was under arrest, held in custody, or being
investigated for commission of a traffic or criminal offense;
to sexual intercourse; or
(g) Being a school employee, he or she engages in sexual intercourse with a
student enrolled in an elementary or secondary school with whom he or she
comes into contact with as a result of that employment.
(2) Rape in the third degree is a Class D felony.
Section 2. KRS 510.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sodomy in the third degree when:
(a) Being twenty-one (21) years of age or older[old or more], he or she engages
in deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is under[less than]
sixteen (16) years old;
(b) Being at least ten (10) years older than a person who is sixteen (16) or
seventeen (17) years old at the time of deviate sexual intercourse, he or she
engages in deviate sexual intercourse with the person;
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years of age or older[old or more], he or she engages
in deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is under[less than]
eighteen (18) years old and for whom he or she provides a foster family home
as defined in KRS 600.020;
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse with a minor
who is under[less than] eighteen (18) years old with whom he or she comes
into contact as a result of that position;
(e) Being a jailer, or an employee, contractor, vendor, or volunteer of the
Page 2 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
Department of Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, or a detention
facility as defined in KRS 520.010, or of an entity under contract with either
department or a detention facility for the custody, supervision, evaluation, or
treatment of offenders, he or she subjects a person who he or she knows is
incarcerated, supervised, evaluated, or treated by the Department of
Corrections, Department of Juvenile Justice, detention facility, or contracting
entity, to deviate sexual intercourse;[ or]
(f) Being a peace officer, while serving in his or her official capacity, he or she
subjects a person who the officer:
1. Arrested, held in custody, or investigated for commission of a traffic or
criminal offense; or
2. Knew or should have known was under arrest, held in custody, or being
investigated for commission of a traffic or criminal offense;
to deviate sexual intercourse; or
(g) Being a school employee, he or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse
with a student enrolled in an elementary or secondary school with whom he
or she comes into contact with as a result of that employment.
(2) Sodomy in the third degree is a Class D felony.
Section 3. KRS 510.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual abuse in the first degree when:
(a) He or she subjects another person to sexual contact by forcible compulsion;[
or]
(b) He or she subjects another person to sexual contact who is incapable of
consent because he or she:
1. Is physically helpless;
2. Is under[less than] twelve (12) years old;
3. Is mentally incapacitated; or
Page 3 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
4. Is an individual with an intellectual disability;[ or]
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years of age or older[old or more], he or she:
1. Subjects another person who is under[less than] sixteen (16) years old
to sexual contact;
2. Engages in masturbation in the presence of another person who is
under[less than] sixteen (16) years old and knows or has reason to know
the other person is present; or
3. Engages in masturbation while using the internet, telephone, or other
electronic communication device while communicating with a minor
who the person knows is under[less than] sixteen (16) years old, and the
minor can see or hear the person masturbate;[ or]
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she, regardless of his or her age, subjects a minor who
is under[less than] eighteen (18) years old, with whom he or she comes into
contact as a result of that position, to sexual contact or engages in
masturbation in the presence of the minor and knows or has reason to know
the minor is present or engages in masturbation while using the internet,
telephone, or other electronic communication device while communicating
with a minor who the person knows is under[less than] sixteen (16) years old,
and the minor can see or hear the person masturbate; or
(e) Being a school employee, he or she;
1. Subjects a student to sexual contact;
2. Engages in masturbation in the presence of a student and knows or
has reason to know the student is present; or
3. Engages in masturbation while using the internet, telephone, or other
electronic communication device while communicating with a student
and the student can see or hear the school employee masturbate; and
Page 4 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
the student is a student enrolled in an elementary or secondary school with
whom the school employee comes into contact with as a result of that
employment.
(2) Sexual abuse in the first degree is a Class D felony, unless the victim is under[less
than] twelve (12) years old, in which case the offense shall be a Class C felony.
Section 4. KRS 510.010 is amended to read as follows:
The following definitions apply in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Adult intermediary" means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older
and communicates with another for the purpose of procuring or promoting the
use of a minor in violation of KRS 510.155;
(2) "Deviate sexual intercourse" means any act of sexual gratification involving the sex
organs of one person and the mouth or anus of another; or penetration of the anus of
one person by any body part or a foreign object manipulated by another person.
"Deviate sexual intercourse" does not include penetration of the anus by any body
part or a foreign object in the course of the performance of generally recognized
health-care practices;
(3)[(2)] "Forcible compulsion" means physical force or threat of physical force,
express or implied, which places a person in fear of immediate death, physical
injury to self or another person, fear of the immediate kidnap of self or another
person, or fear of any offense under this chapter. Physical resistance on the part of
the victim shall not be necessary to meet this definition;
(4) "Foreign object" means anything used in commission of a sexual act other than
the person of the actor;
(5) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly
subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in
adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period;
(6)[(3)] "Mental illness" means a diagnostic term that covers many clinical categories,
Page 5 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
typically including behavioral or psychological symptoms, or both, along with
impairment of personal and social function, and specifically defined and clinically
interpreted through reference to criteria contained in the most recent edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders[ (Third Edition) and any
subsequent revision thereto], of the American Psychiatric Association;[
(4) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means a person with significantly
subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in
adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period, as defined in
KRS Chapter 202B;]
(7)[(5)] "Mentally incapacitated" means that a person is rendered temporarily
incapable of appraising or controlling his or her conduct as a result of the influence
of an intoxicating substance administered to him or her without his or her consent
or as a result of any other act committed upon him or her without his or her consent;
(8)[(6)] "Physically helpless" means that a person is unconscious or for any other
reason is physically unable to communicate unwillingness to an act. "Physically
helpless" also includes a person who has been rendered unconscious or for any
other reason is physically unable to communicate an unwillingness to an act as a
result of the influence of a controlled substance or legend drug;
(9) "Registrant" has the same meaning as in KRS 17.500;
(10) "School employee" means:
(a) An adult employee of a public school district or private, parochial, or
church school who:
1. Is not enrolled in the school district or school; and
2. Serves as a:
a. School administrator;
b. Classified school employee;
c. Certified employee;
Page 6 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
d. Nonfaculty coach or assistant coach; or
e. Contract employee, including but not limited to health staff
working under a contract between a health clinic and the school
district; and
(b) Any employee of the Kentucky Department of Education or a regional
education cooperative who is assigned to a school or area technology center
within the school district;
(11)[(7)] "Sexual contact" means the touching of a person's intimate parts or the
touching of the clothing or other material intended to cover the immediate area of a
person's intimate parts, if that touching can be construed by a reasonable person as
being done:
(a) For the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification of either party;
(b) For a sexual purpose; or
(c) In a sexual manner for the purpose of:
1. Exacting revenge or retribution;
2. Humiliating or degrading; or
3. Punishment; and
(12)[(8)] "Sexual intercourse" means sexual intercourse in its ordinary sense and
includes penetration of the sex organs of one person by any body part or a foreign
object manipulated by another person. Sexual intercourse occurs upon any
penetration, however slight; emission is not required. "Sexual intercourse" does not
include penetration of the sex organ by any body part or a foreign object in the
course of the performance of generally recognized health-care practices[;
(9) "Foreign object" means anything used in commission of a sexual act other than the
person of the actor;
(10) "Registrant" has the same meaning as in KRS 17.500; and
(11) "Adult intermediary" means a person who is age eighteen (18) years or older, who
Page 7 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
communicates with another for the purpose of procuring or promoting the use of a
minor in violation of KRS 510.155].
Section 5. KRS 161.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as described in KRS 161.795, the Education Professional Standards Board
may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or
supervisory conditions upon; issue a written reprimand or admonishment; or any
combination of those actions regarding any certificate issued under KRS 161.010 to
161.100, or any certificate or license issued under any previous law to
superintendents, principals, teachers, substitute teachers, interns, supervisors,
directors of pupil personnel, or other administrative, supervisory, or instructional
employees for the following reasons:
(a) Being convicted of, or entering an ["]Alford["] plea or plea of nolo contendere
to, notwithstanding an order granting probation or suspending imposition of
any sentence imposed following the conviction or entry of the plea, one (1) of
the following:
1. A felony;
2. A misdemeanor under KRS Chapter 218A, 508, 509, 510, 522, 525,
529, 530, or 531; or
3. A misdemeanor involving a student or minor.
A certified copy of the conviction or plea shall be conclusive evidence of the
conviction or plea;
(b) Having sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a student or
minor. Conviction in a criminal proceeding shall not be a requirement for
disciplinary action;
(c) Committing any act that constitutes fraudulent, corrupt, dishonest, or immoral
conduct. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding
shall not be a condition precedent to disciplinary action;
Page 8 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(d) Demonstrating willful or careless disregard for the health, welfare, or safety
of others;
(e) Physical or mental incapacity that prevents the certificate holder from
performing duties with reasonable skill, competence, or safety;
(f) Possessing, using, or being under the influence of alcohol, which impairs the
performance of duties;
(g) Unlawfully possessing or unlawfully using a drug during the performance of
duties;
(h) Incompetency or neglect of duty;
(i) Making, or causing to be made, any false or misleading statement or
concealing a material fact in obtaining issuance or renewal of any certificate;
(j) Failing to report as required by subsection (3) of this section;
(k) Failing to comply with an order of the Education Professional Standards
Board;
(l) Violating any state statute relating to schools or the teaching profession;
(m) Violating the professional code of ethics for Kentucky school certified
personnel established by the Education Professional Standards Board through
the promulgation of administrative regulation;
(n) Violating any administrative regulation promulgated by the Education
Professional Standards Board or the Kentucky Board of Education; or
(o) Receiving disciplinary action or having the issuance of a certificate denied or
restricted by another jurisdiction on grounds that constitute a violation of this
subsection.
(2) The Education Professional Standards Board shall respond to complaints against a
certificate holder by the following process:
(a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, within thirty
(30) calendar days of the receipt of a completed complaint, board staff
Page 9 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
shall conduct an initial review to determine whether there is sufficient
evidence that a violation may have occurred and shall provide notice of
the initial determination to the certificate holder within seven (7)
business days that shall include the complete copy of the report and all
underlying relevant documents and records. If the complaint alleges
unauthorized electronic communication as defined in KRS 160.145,
sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the identity of a complainant
that is not the superintendent and any identifying information of the
minor involved in the complaint shall remain confidential.
2. When a complaint alleges unauthorized electronic communication, as
defined in KRS 160.145, sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the
board staff shall have one hundred twenty (120) days to conduct the
initial review required by subparagraph 1. of this paragraph;
(b) Upon receipt of the notice, the certificate holder shall have thirty (30)
calendar days to respond or provide a rebuttal to any complaint that was
determined to contain sufficient evidence that a violation may have occurred.
The response period shall be extended an additional thirty (30) calendar days
upon the certificate holder's written request submitted to the board;
(c) Within ten (10) business days of the receipt of the certificate holder's response
or the end of the response period established in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, board staff shall conduct another review of the complaint to
determine if sufficient evidence exists to support a violation. If the board staff
determines that the evidence is:
1. Insufficient, then the board staff shall recommend dismissal and shall
notify the certificate holder and the complainant of the recommendation
within seven (7) business days of the determination; or
2. Sufficient, then the board staff shall have seven (7) business days to
Page 10 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
notify the certificate holder and the complainant of the determination.
Notice to the complainant shall only state that further proceedings will
occur;
(d) Upon a determination that sufficient evidence exists to support a possible
violation, within the notice required under paragraph (c)2. of this subsection,
board staff shall initiate an in-person or virtual conference with the certificate
holder to share information and to determine if an agreed resolution can be
recommended to the board concerning the alleged violation. The conference
shall be scheduled within thirty (30) calendar days of the determination. The
certificate holder may decline the conference. If the conference does not occur
due to the certificate holder's failure to respond within the thirty (30) calendar
days, the required conference shall be considered waived. The certificate
holder may have an attorney present at the conference;
(e) Upon the conclusion of the thirty (30) calendar days conference period, the
board shall act on the complaint within thirty (30) calendar days. If the board
fails to act on the complaint within the thirty (30) calendar days, then the
complaint shall be considered dismissed. The board shall consider the entirety
of the complaint with any associated response or recommended agreed
resolution to determine:
1. Dismissal, conditional dismissal upon completion of training,
admonishment, further investigation, or initiation of a hearing;
2. Approval of the recommended agreed resolution; or
3. A deferral if:
a. The content of the complaint is subject to ongoing:
i. Criminal investigation or proceedings;
ii. Child abuse, dependency, or neglect investigation by an
authorized state agency; or
Page 11 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
iii. Teacher tribunal process as provided in KRS 161.790; or
b. The deferral is agreed to by the certificate holder; and
(f) The provision of a confirmation of receipt from the board to the certificate
holder whenever the certificate holder submits a response or correspondence
to the board.
(3) (a) The superintendent of each local school district shall report in writing to the
Education Professional Standards Board the name, address, phone number,
Social Security number, and position name of any certified school employee
in the superintendent's[employee's] district:
1. Whose contract is terminated or not renewed, for cause except failure to
meet local standards for quality of teaching performance prior to the
employee gaining tenure;
2. Who resigns from, or otherwise leaves, a position under threat of
contract termination, or nonrenewal, for cause;
3. Who is convicted in a criminal prosecution; or
4. Who otherwise may have engaged in any actions or conduct while
employed in the school district that might reasonably be expected to
warrant consideration for action against the certificate under subsection
(1) of this section.
The duty to report shall exist without regard to any disciplinary action, or lack
thereof, by the superintendent, and the required report shall be submitted
within thirty (30) calendar days of the event giving rise to the duty to report.
(b) The district superintendent shall inform the Education Professional Standards
Board in writing of the full facts and circumstances leading to the contract
termination or nonrenewal, resignation, or other absence, conviction, or
otherwise reported actions or conduct of the certified employee, that may
warrant action against the certificate under subsection (1) of this section, and
Page 12 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
shall forward copies of all relevant documents and records in his or her
possession.
(c) The Education Professional Standards Board shall provide the superintendent
confirmation of receipt of any report submitted by the superintendent within
seven (7) business days and shall provide the superintendent with notice of:
1. Whether or not board staff determine that there is sufficient evidence in
the report that a violation may have occurred; and
2. Any board action taken against the certificate holder who is the subject
of the report.
(d) The Education Professional Standards Board may consider reports and
information received from other sources.
(e) The certified school employee shall be given a copy of any report provided to
the Education Professional Standards Board by the district superintendent or
other sources. The employee shall have the right to file a written rebuttal
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to the report which shall be placed in
the official file with the report.
(4) A finding or action by a school superintendent or tribunal does not create a
presumption of a violation or lack of a violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The board may issue a written admonishment to the certificate holder if the board
determines, based on the evidence, that a violation has occurred that is not of a
serious nature. A copy of the written admonishment shall be placed in the official
file of the certificate holder. The certificate holder may respond in writing to the
admonishment within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt and have that response
placed in his or her official certification file. Alternatively, the certificate holder
may file a request for a hearing with the board within thirty (30) calendar days of
receipt of the admonishment. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the board
shall set aside the written admonishment and set the matter for hearing pursuant to
Page 13 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the
request.
(6) (a) In accordance with the timeline specified in this section, the Education
Professional Standards Board shall schedule and conduct a hearing in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B:
1. Upon determining that a complaint warrants possible revoking,
suspending, refusing to renew, imposing probationary or supervisory
conditions upon, issuing a written reprimand, or any combination of
these actions regarding any certificate;
2. After denying an application for a certificate, upon written request filed
within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the letter advising of the
denial; or
3. After issuing a written admonishment, upon written request for a
hearing filed within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the written
admonishment.
(b) If after the hearing required under paragraph (a) of this subsection is
scheduled and the certificate holder or applicant believes the hearing is not
timely, the certificate holder or applicant may submit a request for an
expedited hearing, and the hearing shall be conducted within sixty (60)
calendar days of the request.
(c) Upon request, a hearing may be public or private at the discretion of the
certified employee or applicant.
(d) The hearing shall be conducted before a hearing officer secured by the board
pursuant to KRS 13B.030 and the board may:
1. Employ hearing officers;
2. Contract with another agency for hearing officers;
3. Contract with private attorneys through personal service contracts; or
Page 14 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
4. Secure a hearing officer from the Attorney General's office.
(e) The hearing shall afford the certificate holder all the rights secured under KRS
Chapter 13B.
(7) The Education Professional Standards Board or its chair may take emergency action
pursuant to KRS 13B.125. Emergency action shall not affect a certificate holder's
contract or tenure rights in the school district.
(8) If the Education Professional Standards Board substantiates that sexual contact
occurred between a certified employee and a student or minor, the employee's
certificate may be revoked or suspended with mandatory treatment of the employee
as prescribed by the Education Professional Standards Board. The Education
Professional Standards Board may require the employee to pay a specified amount
for mental health services for the student or minor which are needed as a result of
the sexual contact.
(9) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may enter into
an agreed order or accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with the certificate
holder.
(10) The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its decision on any disciplinary
action.
(11) (a) Suspension of a certificate shall be for a specified period of time, not to
exceed two (2) years.
(b)[(a)] At the conclusion of the specified period, upon demonstration of
compliance with any educational requirements and the terms set forth in the
agreed order, the certificate shall be reactivated.
(c)[(b)] A suspended certificate is subject to expiration and termination.
(12) (a) Revocation of a certificate is a permanent forfeiture. The board shall establish
the minimum period of time before an applicant can apply for a new
certificate.
Page 15 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(b)[(a)] At the conclusion of the specified period, and upon demonstration of
compliance with any educational requirements and the terms set forth in the
agreed order, the applicant shall bear the burden of proof to show that he or
she is again fit for practice.
(c)[(b)] The board shall have discretion to impose conditions that it deems
reasonably appropriate to ensure the applicant's fitness and the protection of
public safety. Any conditions imposed by the board shall address or apply to
only that time period after the revocation of the certificate.
(13) An appeal from any final order of the Education Professional Standards Board shall
be filed in Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the
certificate holder was employed when the incident occurred in accordance with
KRS 13B.140[Chapter 13B which provides that all final orders of an agency shall
be subject to judicial review].
Section 6. KRS 309.362 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may deny or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license,
may issue an administrative reprimand, or may impose probationary conditions or
fines not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation when the licensee
has engaged in unprofessional conduct that has endangered or is likely to endanger
the health, welfare, or safety of the public. Unprofessional conduct shall include the
following:
(a) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud, misrepresentation,
concealment of material facts, or making a false statement to the board;
(b) Being convicted of a felony in any court if the act or acts for which the
licensee or applicant for license was convicted are determined by the board to
have a direct bearing on whether the person is trustworthy to serve the public
as a licensed massage therapist, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.
["Conviction," ]As used in this paragraph, "convicted" includes[shall
Page 16 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
include] a finding or verdict of guilty, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo
contendere in a court of law;
(c) Violating any lawful order or administrative regulation promulgated by the
board;
(d) Violating any provision of this chapter or administrative regulations
promulgated under this chapter[thereunder];
(e) Having sexual contact as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)] with a client or
having engaged or attempted to engage in lewd or immoral conduct with any
client or patient;
(f) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement or advertising services, in a false or
misleading manner;
(g) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of
massage therapy;
(h) Violating the standards of practice or the code of ethics as promulgated by
administrative regulations;
(i) Violating KRS 304.39-215; or
(j) Engaging in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4)
or (5).
(2) The board may, at its discretion, deny, refuse to renew, suspend or revoke a license,
or impose probationary conditions following an administrative hearing pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13B and in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated
by the board.
(3) The surrender of a license shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to proceed with
disciplinary actions under KRS 309.350 to 309.364.
Section 7. KRS 311.595 is amended to read as follows:
If the power has not been transferred by statute to some other board, commission, or
Page 17 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
agency of the Commonwealth[this state], the board may deny an application or
reregistration for a license; place a licensee on probation for a period not to exceed five
(5) years; suspend a license for a period not to exceed five (5) years; limit or restrict a
license for an indefinite period; or revoke any license [heretofore or hereafter ]issued by
the board, upon proof that the licensee has:
(1) Knowingly made or presented, or caused to be made or presented, any false,
fraudulent, or forged statement, writing, certificate, diploma, or other thing, in
connection with an application for a license or permit;
(2) Practiced, or aided or abetted in the practice of fraud, forgery, deception, collusion,
or conspiracy in connection with an examination for a license;
(3) Committed, procured, or aided in the procurement of an unlawful abortion,
including a partial-birth abortion or an abortion in violation of KRS 311.731;
(4) Entered a guilty or nolo contendere plea, or been convicted, by any court within or
without the Commonwealth of Kentucky of a crime as defined in KRS 335B.010, if
in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(5) Been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a
patient, or a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,] 530.064(1)(a)[,] or
531.310, or been found by the board to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS
510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under the care of the physician;
(6) Become addicted to a controlled substance;
(7) Become a chronic or persistent alcoholic;
(8) Been unable or is unable to practice medicine according to acceptable and
prevailing standards of care by reason of mental or physical illness or other
condition including but not limited to physical deterioration that adversely affects
cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills, or by reason of an extended absence from the
active practice of medicine;
(9) Engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct of a character likely
Page 18 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
to deceive, defraud, or harm the public or any member of the public[thereof];
(10) Knowingly made, or caused to be made, or aided or abetted in the making of, a
false statement in any document executed in connection with the practice of his or
her profession;
(11) Employed, as a practitioner of medicine or osteopathy in the practice of his or her
profession in the Commonwealth[this state], any person not duly licensed or
otherwise aided, assisted, or abetted the unlawful practice of medicine or
osteopathy or any other healing art;
(12) Violated or attempted to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisted in or abetted the
violation of, or conspired to violate any provision or term of any medical practice
act, including but not limited to the code of conduct promulgated by the board
under KRS 311.601 or any other valid regulation of the board;
(13) Violated any agreed order, letter of agreement, final order, or emergency order
issued by the board;
(14) Engaged in or attempted to engage in the practice of medicine or osteopathy under a
false or assumed name, or impersonated another practitioner of a like, similar, or
different name;
(15) Obtained a fee or other thing of value on the fraudulent representation that a
manifestly incurable condition could be cured;
(16) Willfully violated a confidential communication;
(17) Had his or her license to practice medicine or osteopathy in any other state,
territory, or foreign nation revoked, suspended, restricted, or limited or has been
subjected to other disciplinary action by the licensing authority thereof. This
subsection shall not require relitigation of the disciplinary action;
(18) Failed or refused, without legal justification, to practice medicine in a rural area of
the Commonwealth[this state] in violation of a valid medical scholarship loan
contract with the trustees of the rural Kentucky medical scholarship fund;
Page 19 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(19) Given or received, directly or indirectly, from any person, firm, or corporation, any
fee, commission, rebate, or other form of compensation for sending, referring, or
otherwise inducing a person to communicate with a person licensed under KRS
311.530 to 311.620 in his or her professional capacity or for any professional
services not actually and personally rendered.[; provided,] However, [that nothing
contained in ]this subsection shall not prohibit persons holding valid and current
licenses under KRS 311.530 to 311.620 from practicing medicine in partnership or
association or in a professional service corporation authorized by KRS Chapter 274,
as [now or hereinafter ]amended, or from pooling, sharing, dividing, or
apportioning the fees and moneys received by them or by the partnership,
corporation, or association in accordance with the partnership agreement or the
policies of the board of directors of the corporation or association. [Nothing
contained in ]This subsection shall not abrogate the right of two (2) or more persons
holding valid and current licenses under KRS 311.530 to 311.620 to receive
adequate compensation for concurrently rendering professional care to a single
patient and divide a fee, if the patient has full knowledge of this division and if the
division is made in proportion to the services performed and responsibility assumed
by each;
(20) Been removed, suspended, expelled, or disciplined by any professional medical
association or society when the action was based upon what the association or
society found to be unprofessional conduct, professional incompetence,
malpractice, or a violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 311. This subsection
shall not require relitigation of the disciplinary action;
(21) Been disciplined by a licensed hospital or medical staff of the hospital, including
removal, suspension, limitation of hospital privileges, failing to renew privileges for
cause, resignation of privileges under pressure or investigation, or other disciplinary
action if the action was based upon what the hospital or medical staff found to be
Page 20 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
unprofessional conduct, professional incompetence, malpractice, or a violation of
any provisions of KRS Chapter 311. This subsection shall not require relitigation of
the disciplinary action;
(22) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 213.101, 311.782, or 311.783 or
failed to submit to the Vital Statistics Branch in accordance with a court order a
complete report as described in KRS 213.101;
(23) Failed to comply with any of the requirements regarding making or maintaining
medical records or documents described in KRS 311.7704 or 311.7707;
(24) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 311.7705 or 311.7706;
(25) Been convicted of female genital mutilation under KRS 508.125, which shall result
in mandatory revocation of a license;
(26) As provided in KRS 311.824(2), been convicted of a violation of KRS 311.823(2);
or
(27) Failed to comply with the requirements of KRS 311.732.
Section 8. KRS 311A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not:
(a) Call or hold himself or herself out as or use the title of emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, emergency medical
responder, paramedic, advanced practice paramedic, emergency medical
services educator, paramedic course coordinator, emergency medical services
medical director, mobile integrated healthcare program medical director, or
any other member of emergency medical services personnel unless licensed or
certified under the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph
shall not apply if the board does not license or certify a person as an instructor
in a particular discipline regulated by the board;
(b) Operate or offer to operate or represent or advertise the operation of a school
or other educational program for emergency medical services personnel
Page 21 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
unless the school or educational program has been approved and licensed
under the provisions of this chapter. The provisions of this paragraph shall not
apply to continuing education provided by a licensed ambulance service for
anyone certified or licensed by the board given by an ambulance service for
its employees or volunteers; or
(c) Knowingly employ emergency medical services personnel unless that person
is licensed or certified under the provisions of this chapter.
(2) A[No] person who is licensed or certified by the board or[ who is] an applicant for
licensure or certification by the board shall not:
(a) If licensed or certified, violate any provision of this chapter or any
administrative regulation promulgated by the board;
(b) Use fraud or deceit in obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or
certification from the board, or be granted a license upon mistake of a material
fact;
(c) If licensed or certified by the board, grossly negligently or willfully act in a
manner inconsistent with the practice of the discipline for which the person is
certified or licensed;
(d) Be unfit or incompetent to practice a discipline regulated by the board by
reason of negligence or other causes;
(e) Abuse, misuse, or misappropriate any drugs placed in the custody of the
licensee or certified person for administration, or for use of others;
(f) Falsify or fail to make essential entries on essential records;
(g) Be convicted of a misdemeanor which involved acts that bear directly on the
qualifications or ability of the applicant, licensee, or certified person to
practice the discipline for which the person is an applicant, licensee, or
certified person, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(h) Be convicted of a misdemeanor which involved fraud, deceit, breach of trust,
Page 22 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
or physical harm or endangerment to self or others, acts that bear directly on
the qualifications or ability of the applicant, licensee, or certificate holder to
practice acts in the license or certification held or sought, if in accordance
with KRS Chapter 335B;
(i) Be convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a
patient or be found by the board to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS
510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under the care of the licensee
or certificate holder;
(j) Have had his or her license or credential to practice as a nurse or physician
denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in
Kentucky or in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a license to
be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in
this Commonwealth;
(k) Have a license or certification to practice in any activity regulated by the
board denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined
in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a license or certification
to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined
in this Commonwealth;
(l) Violate any lawful order or directive previously entered by the board;
(m) Have been listed on the nurse aide abuse registry with a substantiated finding
of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property; or
(n) Be convicted of, have entered a guilty plea to, or have entered an Alford plea
to a felony offense, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B.
(3) It shall be unlawful for an employer of a person licensed or certified by the board
having knowledge of the facts to refrain from reporting to the board on an official
complaint form approved by the board through administrative regulation any person
licensed or certified by the board who:
Page 23 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(a) Has been convicted of, has entered a guilty plea to, or has entered an Alford
plea to a felony offense;
(b) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony which involved acts that bear
directly on the qualifications or ability of the applicant, licensee, or certified
person to practice the discipline for which they are an applicant, licensee, or
certified person;
(c) Is reasonably suspected of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to
procure a license or certification from the board;
(d) Is reasonably suspected of grossly negligently or willfully acting in a manner
inconsistent with the practice of the discipline for which they are certified or
licensed;
(e) Is reasonably suspected of being unfit or incompetent to practice a discipline
regulated by the board by reason of negligence or other causes, including but
not limited to being unable to practice the discipline for which they are
licensed or certified with reasonable skill or safety;
(f) Is reasonably suspected of violating any provisions of this chapter or the
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter;
(g) Has a license or certification to practice an activity regulated by the board
denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in
another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a license or certification to
be denied, limited, suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in
this Commonwealth;
(h) Is practicing an activity regulated by the board without a current active license
or certification issued by the board;
(i) Is reasonably suspected of abusing, misusing, or misappropriating any drugs
placed in the custody of the licensee or certified person for administration or
for use of others; or
Page 24 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(j) Is suspected of falsifying or in a grossly negligent manner making incorrect
entries or failing to make essential entries on essential records.
(4) A person who violates subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section shall be guilty of
a Class A misdemeanor for the[a] first offense and a Class D felony for each
subsequent offense.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not preclude prosecution for the unlawful
practice of medicine, nursing, or other practice certified or licensed by an agency of
the Commonwealth.
(6) The filing of criminal charges or a criminal conviction for violation of the
provisions of this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated under this
chapter[thereunder] shall not preclude the office of the board from instituting or
imposing board disciplinary action authorized by this chapter against any person or
organization violating this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated
under this chapter[thereunder].
(7) The institution or imposition of disciplinary action by the office of the board against
any person or organization violating the provisions of this chapter or the
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter[thereunder] shall not
preclude the filing of criminal charges against or a criminal conviction of any
person or organization for violation of the provisions of this chapter or the
administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter[thereunder].
Section 9. KRS 314.091 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall have power to reprimand, deny, limit, revoke, probate, or suspend
any license or credential to practice nursing issued by the board or applied for in
accordance with this chapter or the privilege to practice as a nurse recognized by
the board in accordance with this chapter, or to otherwise discipline a licensee,
credential holder, privilege holder, or applicant, or to deny admission to the
licensure examination, or to require evidence of evaluation and therapy upon proof
Page 25 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
that the person:
(a) Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license,
credential, or privilege to practice nursing;
(b) Has been convicted of any felony, or a misdemeanor involving drugs, alcohol,
fraud, deceit, falsification of records, a breach of trust, physical harm or
endangerment to others, or dishonesty, under the laws of any state or of the
United States, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. The record of
conviction or a copy of the conviction[thereof], certified by the clerk of the
court or by the judge who presided over the conviction, shall be conclusive
evidence;
(c) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510
involving a patient, or a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,]
530.064(1)(a)[,] or 531.310, or has been found by the board to have had
sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient
was under the care of the nurse;
(d) Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the practice of
nursing;
(e) Is unfit or incompetent to practice nursing by reason of negligence or other
causes, including but not limited to, being unable to practice nursing with
reasonable skill or safety;
(f) Abuses controlled substances, prescription medications, illegal substances, or
alcohol;
(g) Has misused or misappropriated any drugs placed in the custody of the nurse
for administration, or for use of others;
(h) Has falsified or in a negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make
essential entries on essential records;
(i) Has a license, privilege, or credential to practice as a nurse denied, limited,
Page 26 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in another jurisdiction
on grounds sufficient to cause a license or privilege to be denied, limited,
suspended, probated, revoked, or otherwise disciplined in this
Commonwealth, including action by another jurisdiction for failure to repay a
student loan;
(j) Has violated any of the provisions of this chapter;
(k) Has violated any lawful order or directive previously entered by the board;
(l) Has violated any administrative regulation promulgated by the board;
(m) Has been listed on either the adult caregiver misconduct registry or the nurse
aide abuse registry with a substantiated finding of abuse, neglect, or
misappropriation of property, or has a substantiated finding or judicial finding
of the abuse or neglect of a child;
(n) Has violated the confidentiality of information or knowledge concerning any
patient, except as authorized or required by law;
(o) Used or possessed a Schedule I controlled substance;
(p) Has used or been impaired as a consequence of the use of alcohol or drugs
while practicing as a nurse;
(q) Has violated KRS 304.39-215;
(r) Has engaged in conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-
060(4) or (5); or
(s) As provided in KRS 311.824(2), has been convicted of a violation of KRS
311.823(2).
(2) All hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. A suspended
or revoked license, privilege, or credential may be reinstated at the discretion of the
board, and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board.
(3) The executive director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses
and the production of documents in the conduct of an investigation. The subpoenas
Page 27 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
may be enforced by the Circuit Court as for contempt. Any order or subpoena of the
court requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of
documentary evidence may be enforced and shall be valid anywhere in the
Commonwealth[this state].
(4) At all hearings on request of the board the Attorney General of the
Commonwealth[this state] or one (1) of the assistant attorneys general designated
by the Attorney General shall appear and represent the board.
(5) A final order of the board shall be by majority vote thereof.
(6) Any person adversely affected by any final order of the board may obtain a review
thereof by filing a written petition for review with the Circuit Court of the county in
which the board's offices are located in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(7) If the board substantiates that sexual contact occurred between a nurse and a patient
while the patient was under the care of or in a professional relationship with the
nurse, the nurse's license, privilege, or credential may be revoked or suspended with
mandatory treatment of the nurse as prescribed by the board. The board may require
the nurse to pay a specified amount for mental health services for the patient which
are needed as a result of the sexual contact.
(8) The board may, by administrative regulation, provide for the recovery of the costs
of an administrative hearing.
Section 10. KRS 319C.070 is amended to read as follows:
The board may deny an application or reregistration for a license, place a licensee on
probation for a period not to exceed five (5) years, suspend a license for a period not to
exceed five (5) years, limit or restrict a license for an indefinite period, or revoke any
license issued by the board, upon proof that the licensee has:
(1) Knowingly made or presented, or caused to be made or presented, any false,
fraudulent, or forged statement, writing, certificate, diploma, or other thing, in
connection with an application for a license or permit;
Page 28 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(2) Practiced, or aided or abetted in the practice of, fraud, forgery, deception, collusion,
or conspiracy in connection with an examination for a license;
(3) Entered a guilty or nolo contendere plea, or been convicted, of a crime as defined in
KRS 335B.010, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(4) Been convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a
patient, or a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510[,] or KRS 530.064(1)(a) or
531.310, or been found by the board to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS
510.010[(7)] with a patient while the patient was under the care of the licensee;
(5) Become addicted to a controlled substance;
(6) Become a chronic or persistent alcoholic;
(7) Been unable or is unable to practice applied behavior analysis according to
acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental or physical illness
or other condition, including but not limited to physical deterioration that adversely
affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills, or by reason of an extended absence
from the active practice of applied behavior analysis;
(8) Engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or unprofessional conduct of a character likely
to deceive, defraud, or harm the public or any member of the public[thereof]; or
(9) Knowingly made, or caused to be made, or aided or abetted in the making of, a
false statement in any document executed in connection with the practice of his or
her profession.
Section 11. KRS 319C.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing
conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, may take any one (1) or a
combination of the following actions against any applied behavior analyst or
applied assistant behavior analyst licensee or applicant:
(a) Refuse to license or certify any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license or certificate of any person;
Page 29 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(c) Suspend or revoke or place on probation the license or certificate of any
person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person;
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter, not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) The following acts by a licensee may be considered cause for disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of
controlled substances that impairs the licensee's ability to practice applied
behavior analysis;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance
of substandard patient care by himself or herself or by persons working under
his or her supervision due to a deliberate or negligent act or failure to act,
regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct with any person while that person is a patient or client of the behavior
analyst or assistant behavior analyst;
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)], without the
consent of both parties, with an employee or coworker of the licensee;
(e) Sexually harassing an employee or coworker of the licensee;
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of the
Commonwealth[this state] or any other state, territory, or country which
affects his or her ability to continue to practice competently and safely on the
public. ["Conviction," ]As used in this paragraph, "conviction" includes[shall
include] a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo
contendere;
Page 30 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or material
misrepresentation or making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement, or in advertising services in a false or
misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his or her practice of
behavior analysis;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent
jurisdiction and not thereafter having had his or her rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the
board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or
service, or directing or requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment,
procedure, or service from a facility or business in which he or she has a
financial interest; and
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that
impedes his or her ability to practice competently.
(3) A private admonishment shall not be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS
61.878(1)(l). A private admonishment shall not constitute disciplinary action but
may be used by the board for statistical purposes or in subsequent disciplinary
action against the same licensee or applicant.
Section 12. KRS 327.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing
conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B may take any one (1) or a
combination of the following actions against any licensee, certificate holder, or
applicant:
(a) Refuse to license or certify any applicant;
Page 31 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
(b) Refuse to renew the license or certificate of any person;
(c) Suspend or revoke or place on probation the license or certificate of any
person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person;
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500).
(2) The following acts by a licensee, certificate holder, or applicant may be considered
cause for disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of
controlled substances;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance
of substandard patient care by himself or herself or by persons working under
his or her supervision due to a deliberate or negligent act or failure to act,
regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) Having engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct with any person:
1. While that person is a patient of a health care facility as defined in[by]
KRS 216B.015, where the physical therapist or physical therapist's
assistant provides physical therapy services; or
2. While that person is a patient or client of the physical therapist or
physical therapist's assistant;
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined in[by] KRS 510.010[(7)], without the
consent of both parties, with an employee or coworker of the licensee or
certificate holder;
(e) Sexually harassing an employee or coworker of the licensee or certificate
Page 32 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
holder;
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of the
Commonwealth[this state] or any other state, territory, or country which
affects his or her ability to continue to practice competently and safely on the
public, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B. ["Conviction," ]As used in
this paragraph, "conviction" includes[shall include] a finding or verdict of
guilt, an admission of guilt, or a plea of nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license or certificate by fraud or material
misrepresentation or making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement, or advertising services in a false or
misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his or her practice of
physical therapy;
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent
jurisdiction without[and not thereafter] having had his or her rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the
board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or
service, or directing or requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment,
procedure, or service from a facility or business in which he or she has a
financial interest;
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that
impedes his or her ability to practice competently;
(n) Violation of KRS 304.39-215; and
(o) Conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(3) A private admonishment shall not be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS
Page 33 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
61.878(1)(l). A private admonishment shall not constitute disciplinary action but
may be used by the board for statistical purposes or in subsequent disciplinary
action against the same licensee, certificate holder, or applicant.
Section 13. KRS 335.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or
supervisory conditions upon; impose an administrative fine; issue a written
reprimand or admonishment; or any combination of actions regarding any
applicant, license, or licensee upon proof that the applicant or licensee has:
(a) Committed any act of dishonesty or corruption, if in accordance with KRS
Chapter 335B. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal
proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon
conviction of the crime, the judgment and sentence creates a rebuttable
presumption at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the applicant or
licensee. Conviction includes all instances in which a plea of no contest is the
basis of the conviction;
(b) Misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining a license, or in
reinstatement thereof;
(c) Committed any unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice;
(d) Been incompetent or negligent in the practice of social work;
(e) Violated any state statute or administrative regulation governing the practice
of social work or any activities undertaken by a social worker;
(f) Failed to comply with an order issued by the board or an assurance of
voluntary compliance;
(g) Violated the code of ethical conduct as set forth by the board by promulgation
of an administrative regulation;
(h) Been legally declared mentally incompetent;
(i) Aided or abetted another person in falsely procuring or attempting to procure
Page 34 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
a license; or
(j) Aided or abetted an unlicensed person in the practice of social work.
(2) Five (5) years from the date of a revocation, any person whose license has been
revoked may petition the board for reinstatement. The board shall investigate the
petition and may reinstate the license upon a finding that the individual has
complied with any terms prescribed by the board and is again able to engage
competently in the practice of social work.
(3) If an alleged violation is not of a serious nature and the evidence presented to the
board, after the investigation and appropriate opportunity for the licensee to
respond, provides a clear indication that the alleged violation did in fact occur, the
board may issue a written admonishment to the licensee. A copy of the
admonishment shall be placed in the permanent file of the licensee. The licensee
shall have the right to file a response within thirty (30) days of its receipt and to
have the response placed in the licensee's permanent file. Alternatively, the licensee
may file a request for a hearing, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the written
admonishment. Upon receipt of this request, the board shall set aside the written
admonishment and set the matter for hearing.
(4) At any time during the investigative or hearing processes, the board may enter into
an agreed order with, or accept an assurance of voluntary compliance from, the
licensee that effectively satisfies the complaint.
(5) The board may reconsider, modify, or reverse its decision regarding probation,
suspension, or any other disciplinary action.
(6) Upon proof substantiating that sexual contact occurred between a social worker
licensed by the board and a client while the client was under the care of or in a
professional relationship with the social worker, the social worker's license may be
revoked or suspended with mandatory treatment of the social worker as prescribed
by the board. The board may require the social worker to pay a specified amount for
Page 35 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1313
mental health services for the client which are needed as a result of the sexual
contact.
(7) The board may revoke the license of a social worker if the social worker has been
convicted of a misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510 involving a client or a
felony offense under KRS Chapter 510 or KRS[,] 530.064(1)(a)[,] or 531.310, or
has been found to have had sexual contact as defined in KRS 510.010[(7)] with a
client while the client was under the care of the social worker.
Page 36 of 36
XXXX 1/20/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed